Alaska, session 34, HB375.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 04 * Section 1. AS 23.10.069 is amended by adding a new subsection to read: 05 (d) Employment of seasonal seafood processing workers is exempt from the 06 requirements of AS 23.10.066 - 23.10.068. In this subsection, "seasonal seafood 07 processing worker" means an employee who is hired for a specific period related to 08 peak business need, not to exceed six months in each calendar year, to perform work 09 involving heading, gutting, separating, filleting, canning, or other activities intended to 10 prepare seafood for market. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.